Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.142

Combination of offices of treasurer with clerk—Authorized.

The city council of any city of the second class is authorized to provide by ordinance that the office of treasurer shall be combined with that of clerk, or that the office of clerk shall be combined with that of treasurer: PROVIDED, That such ordinance shall not be voted upon until the next regular meeting after its introduction.

[ 1994 c 81 s 39; 1969 c 116 s 3. Formerly RCW 35.24.142.]